Missouri, session 2026, SB1757.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:

There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or
items stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated, for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:

Section 8.005. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$2,977,347
Expense and Equipment...................................... 250,208
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,227,555

Personal Service................................................. 471,978
Expense and Equipment...................................... 225,000
From Justice Assistance Grant Program Fund (1782).......................... 696,978

Personal Service................................................. 491,019
Expense and Equipment...................................... 420,155
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)........................ 911,174

Personal Service.................................................. 95,374

SB 1757 2
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,164
From Services to Victims Fund (1592). .................................... 105,538

Personal Service................................................. 693,869
Expense and Equipment...................................... 153,843
From Crime Victims Compensation Fund (1681)............................. 847,712

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Crime Prevention Information and Programming Fund
(1253)........................................................... 1,000

Expense and Equipment
From Antiterrorism Fund (1759)........................................... 15,000

Personal Service................................................1,694,524
Expense and Equipment...................................... 21,600,371
From Department Public Safety Federal Homeland Security Fund (1193)........23,294,895

Personal Service................................................. 118,998
Expense and Equipment...................................... 813,000
From MODEX Fund (1867). ............................................ 931,998

For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies,
provided the General Assembly shall be notified of the source
of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service................................................. 168,331
Expense and Equipment...................................... 9,155,000
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)................... 9,323,331
Total.............................................................$39,355,181

Section 8.010. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For drug task force grants, provided three percent (3%) be allowed for
grant administration
Personal Service................................................. $78,786
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,099,892
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$3,178,678


SB 1757 3
Section 8.015. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For scholarships for individuals to attend law enforcement academies
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,000,000

For grants to local law enforcement to support equipment and training
needs, provided that a minimum of 35% shall be distributed to
law enforcement agencies within third class counties
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 10,000,000
Total.............................................................$12,000,000

Section 8.020. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Juvenile Justice Delinquency Prevention Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)......................$1,022,492

Section 8.025. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the establishment and enhancement of local violent crime
prevention programs in Missouri communities and improving
the quality of crime data reporting in compliance with the
National Incident-Based Reporting System
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $500,000

Section 8.030. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the FIFA World Cup Grant Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).....................$59,522,190

Section 8.035. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For a statewide, competitively bid school safety program
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522). .................................. $449,983

Section 8.040. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Counter-Unmanned Aircraft Systems Grant Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).....................$14,190,568


SB 1757 4
Section 8.045. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Narcotics Control Assistance Program and multi-jurisdictional
task forces
From Justice Assistance Grant Program Fund (1782)........................$4,490,000

Section 8.050. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the 988
Public Safety Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $555,122

Section 8.055. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the purpose of providing services for peace officers and first
responders to assist in coping with stress and potential
psychological trauma resulting from a response to a critical
incident or emotionally difficult event
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................. $250,000

Personal Service.................................................. 53,239
Expense and Equipment...................................... 503,511
From 988 Public Safety Fund (1864).................................. 556,750
Total............................................................... $806,750

Section 8.060. To the Department of Public Safety
For any entities providing security and/or other services for the 2026
World Cup
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$12,000,000

Section 8.065. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For statewide fentanyl testing of water at schools, provided that the
Department of Public Safety shall track and report certain
metrics regarding the testing program, including but not limited
to: schools tested and associated school districts, fentanyl
amounts recorded at each school, and subsequent fentanyl use
prevention strategies enacted by tested schools
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).................$2,000,000

SB 1757 5

For statewide fentanyl and additional dangerous narcotics testing of
wastewater at schools for public health and in surrounding areas
for law enforcement activities, provided that the Department of
Public Safety shall track and report certain metrics regarding the
testing program for public health, including but not limited to:
schools tested and associated school districts, narcotics amounts
recorded at each school, and subsequent narcotics use
prevention strategies enacted by tested schools
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 3,000,000
Total..............................................................$5,000,000

Section 8.070. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Sheriff Methamphetamine Relief Taskforce
For supplementing deputy sheriffs' salary and related employment
benefits pursuant to Section 57.278, RSMo
From Deputy Sheriff Salary Supplementation Fund (1913). ..................$5,000,000

For grants to support sheriff deputies working in conjunction with the
Missouri State Highway Patrol
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 1,250,000
Total..............................................................$6,250,000

Section 8.075. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For operating grants to local law enforcement cybercrimes task forces,
provided three percent (3%) is allowed for grant administration
and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 8.335
Personal Service................................................. $69,494
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,447,129
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 2,516,623
Total..............................................................$2,516,623

Section 8.080. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
To provide financial assistance to the spouses, children, and
other dependents of any local law enforcement officers,
paramedics, emergency medical technicians, corrections

SB 1757 6
officers, and/or firefighters who have lost their lives performing
their duties. Deaths from natural causes, illnesses, or injuries are
outside the program's scope, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $70,000

Section 8.085. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Services to Victims Program, provided three percent (3%) of
each grant award be allowed for the administrative expenses of
each grantee
From Services to Victims Fund (1592). ..................................$2,000,000

Section 8.090. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Violence Against Women Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)......................$3,294,343

Section 8.095. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
For the Crime Victims' Compensation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,900,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191). .........4,500,000
From Crime Victims Compensation Fund (1681)............................4,837,329

Personal Service.................................................. 75,348
Expense and Equipment...................................... 160,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191). .......... 235,348

For reimbursing SAFE-Care providers for performing forensic medical
exams on children suspected of having been physically abused
Personal Service.................................................. 44,534
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,422,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 1,466,534
Total.............................................................$13,939,211

Section 8.100. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director

SB 1757 7
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Pretrial Witness Protection Services Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $100,000

Section 8.105. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For witness protection services
From Pretrial Witness Protection Services Fund (1868)......................$2,000,000

Section 8.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the National Forensic Sciences Improvement Act Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)....................... $376,000

Section 8.115. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the State Forensic Laboratory Program
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591). .............................. $360,000

Section 8.120. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Residential Substance Abuse Treatment Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)....................... $742,000

Section 8.125. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For peace officer training
From Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission Fund (1281). .......... $700,000

Section 8.130. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Capitol Police, provided that not more than five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$2,721,073
Expense and Equipment...................................... 170,058
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$2,891,131

Section 8.135. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol

SB 1757 8
For Administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service................................................ $394,927
Expense and Equipment...................................... 20,407
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 415,334

Personal Service...............................................10,849,401
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,481,322
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............14,330,723

Personal Service.................................................. 52,614
Expense and Equipment...................................... 26,953
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................... 79,567

Personal Service................................................... 4,905
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,980
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400). ................................... 18,885

For the High-Intensity Drug Trafficking Area Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).......................2,598,000

For a peer support program for law enforcement and first responders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705).............. 140,000
Total
$17,582,509

Section 8.140. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees' Retirement System, and insurance premiums,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
Personal Service..............................................$22,072,386
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,975,064
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................24,047,450

Personal Service................................................4,803,194
Expense and Equipment...................................... 248,100
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).......................5,051,294


SB 1757 9
Personal Service.................................................. 89,442
Expense and Equipment...................................... 461,143
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................... 550,585

Personal Service................................................1,891,285
Expense and Equipment...................................... 153,784
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400). .................................2,045,069

Personal Service................................................. 370,605
Expense and Equipment...................................... 29,936
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608).............. 400,541

Personal Service..............................................112,717,448
Expense and Equipment...................................... 9,275,876
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)............121,993,324

Personal Service................................................4,435,144
Expense and Equipment...................................... 338,264
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ...............................4,773,408

Personal Service................................................. 124,780
Expense and Equipment...................................... 13,531
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674). ............................... 138,311

Personal Service................................................... 5,766
Expense and Equipment...................................... 889
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695). ............................................ 6,655

Personal Service.................................................. 81,102
Expense and Equipment...................................... 7,132
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772). ................................. 88,234

Personal Service.................................................. 90,056
Expense and Equipment...................................... 6,527
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758). ........................... 96,583

Personal Service.................................................. 94,880
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,104
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297). ......................... 104,984
Total
$159,296,438

SB 1757 10


Section 8.145. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Enforcement Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility
is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service..............................................$20,452,106
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,124,022
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................25,191,780

Personal Service..............................................105,874,709
Expense and Equipment...................................... 8,480,552
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)............114,355,261

Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in
compliance with the United States Department of Justice
Equitable Sharing Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194)...................................1,200,000

Personal Service
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ................................. 21,682

Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................... 537,786

Personal Service.................................................. 10,106
Expense and Equipment...................................... 457,510
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695). .......................................... 467,616

Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758). .......................... 245,242

Personal Service
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400). .................................. 240,435

For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies,
provided the General Assembly shall be notified of the source
of any new funds and the purpose for which they shall be
expended, in writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service................................................6,530,191

SB 1757 11
Expense and Equipment...................................... 5,856,301
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)......................12,386,492

For a statewide interoperable communication system
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)..............8,971,835

For a public order unit program
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).......... 300,000
Total
$163,918,129

Section 8.150. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Water Patrol Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$5,332,959
Expense and Equipment...................................... 225,006
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................5,557,965

Personal Service................................................. 397,226
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,250,590
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).......................2,647,816

Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in
compliance with the United States Department of Justice
Equitable Sharing Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194)..................................... 16,499

For the Water Patrol Division provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service................................................2,516,091
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,581,587
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400). ............................. 4,097,678
Total
$12,319,958

Section 8.155. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol

SB 1757 12
For purchase of vehicles, aircraft, and watercraft for the State Highway
Patrol and the Gaming Commission in accordance with Section
43.265, RSMo, also for gasoline, maintenance, and repair costs
for vehicles, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 8.335
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,846,104
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............17,502,362
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695). ..................................... 9,787,018
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)...................................1,730,468
Total
$30,865,952

Section 8.160. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Crime Labs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$4,444,475
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,839,086
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................6,283,561

Personal Service................................................5,880,229
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,251,166
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)..............8,131,395

Personal Service.................................................. 85,895
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,478,305
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772). ...............................1,564,200

Personal Service................................................. 297,770
Expense and Equipment...................................... 900,071
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).......................1,197,841

Personal Service................................................. 456,080
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,575
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ................................ 458,655

Expense and Equipment
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591). .......................... 357,633

SB 1757 13
Total
$17,993,285

Section 8.165. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Law Enforcement Academy, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $235,414

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)......................... 59,687

Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................... 69,440

Personal Service................................................2,245,469
Expense and Equipment...................................... 77,476
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)..............2,322,945

Personal Service................................................. 153,050
Expense and Equipment...................................... 581,730
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674). .......................... 734,780
Total
$3,422,266

Section 8.170. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Vehicle and Driver Safety
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)....................... $350,000

Personal Service...............................................15,202,840
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,190,359
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............16,393,199

Personal Service................................................. 165,400
Expense and Equipment...................................... 360,632
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297). ......................... 526,032
Total
$17,269,231

SB 1757 14

Section 8.175. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For refunding unused motor vehicle inspection stickers
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............. $100,000

Section 8.180. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Technical Services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service................................................ $318,160
Expense and Equipment...................................... 2,203,508
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,521,668

Personal Service................................................. 586,942
Expense and Equipment...................................... 4,995,288
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152).......................5,582,230

Personal Service...............................................20,791,808
Expense and Equipment...................................... 22,848,458
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............43,640,266

Personal Service................................................5,019,054
Expense and Equipment..........................................2,235,117
For National Criminal Record Reviews.......................... 3,000,000
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ..............................10,254,171

For Livescan purchases, Livescan lease agreements in full, and
Livescan maintenance costs incurred by local and county law
enforcement
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671). ...............................1,715,000

Personal Service
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758). .......................... 104,878
Expense and Equipment
From Criminal Justice Network and Technology Revolving Fund
(1842)........................................................2,819,050

Personal Service
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608).............. 493,220
Expense and Equipment

SB 1757 15
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................... 233,721

For body worn cameras and related data storage for the Missouri State
Highway Patrol and Capitol Police
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 277,031
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400). .................................. 120,051

Personal Service.................................................. 81,979
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,080,460
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).......... 1,162,439
Total
$68,923,725

Section 8.185. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the recoupment, receipt, and disbursement of funds for equipment
replacement, and expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Expense Fund (1793)................................. $35,000

For mental health services for members of the Patrol
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644).............. $250,000

Section 8.190. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund pursuant to Section 307.365, RSMo
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297). ............................$2,000,000

Section 8.195. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
Personal Service................................................ $547,744
Expense and Equipment...................................... 397,594
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)........................ 945,338

Personal Service................................................2,474,273
Expense and Equipment...................................... 817,459
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544). ............. 3,291,732
Total
$4,237,070

Section 8.200. To the Department of Public Safety

SB 1757 16
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
For refunds for unused liquor and beer licenses and for liquor and beer
stamps not used and canceled
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $55,000

Section 8.205. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety, provided for all funds in this section,
five percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment and three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$3,053,592
Expense and Equipment...................................... 188,729
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,242,321

For receiving and expending National Fire Academy Grants and
Assistance to Firefighter Grants
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152)........................ 600,000

Personal Service................................................. 545,809
Expense and Equipment...................................... 74,713
From Elevator Safety Fund (1257). ....................................... 620,522

Personal Service................................................. 757,003
Expense and Equipment...................................... 603,317
From Boiler and Pressure Vessels Safety Fund (1744)........................1,360,320

Personal Service................................................. 113,335
Expense and Equipment...................................... 71,527
From Missouri Explosives Safety Act Administration Fund (1804)............... 184,862

To allow the State Fire Marshal to disburse grants to any
applying volunteer fire protection association for the purpose of
funding such association's costs related to worker's
compensation premiums for volunteer firefighters
From General Revenue Fund (1101).................................. 75,000
Total
$6,083,025

Section 8.210. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment

SB 1757 17
For the Fire Safe Cigarette Program
Personal Service................................................. $28,224
Expense and Equipment...................................... 10,204
From Cigarette Fire Safety Standard and Firefighter Protection Act
Fund (1937). ................................................... $38,428

Section 8.215. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety
For firefighter training contracted services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587)......................... 100,000
From Fire Education Fund (1821).................................... 250,000
Total
$1,350,000

Section 8.220. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For Administration and Service to Veterans
Personal Service...............................................$6,485,350
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,822,643
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)............8,307,993

Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579). .................................. 23,832
Total
$8,331,825

Section 8.225. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For the restoration, renovation, maintenance, and improvements to a
World War I Memorial and Museum
From World War I Memorial Trust Fund (1993). ........................... $150,000

Section 8.230. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For veterans' health and safety initiatives
From Veterans Assistance Fund (1461)...................................$4,557,800

Section 8.235. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission

SB 1757 18
For the Veterans' Service Officer Program
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)...........$1,600,740

Section 8.240. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For Missouri Veterans' Homes
Personal Service..............................................$89,814,504
Expense and Equipment...................................... 30,113,801
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460). ...........................119,928,305

Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579). ........................................ 52,528

Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Stimulus 2021 Fund (2458). .........7,651,047

Personal Service
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304).............. 39,211

For refunds to veterans and/or the U.S. Department of Veterans' Affairs
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460). .............................1,274,400

For overtime to state employees. Non-exempt state employees
identified by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any
remaining funds being used to pay overtime to any other state
employees
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460). ......................... 2,176,346
Total
$131,121,837

Section 8.245. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For the operations of Veterans' Homes and cemeteries, utilities,
systems furniture, and structural modifications
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)............ $299,099
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460). ......................... 4,149,402
Total
$4,448,501

Section 8.250. To the Department of Public Safety

SB 1757 19
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Veterans' Homes Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................$21,675,057
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)...................1

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460). ......................... 33,018,276
Total
$54,693,334

Section 8.255. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For the Divisions of Gaming and Bingo
Personal Service..............................................$20,758,665
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,737,408
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................22,496,073

For treatment, prevention, and support services for compulsive and
problem gamers
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245)..........................7,000,000

For prevention and education services
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245)..........................1,500,000

For adult psychiatric services
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245)..........................2,503,197

For a digital mental health program for problematic gambling,
delivered through a single digital platform provider with a
business location in the State of Missouri that must offer no-
cost, multilingual, community and anonymous support for
individuals and their loved ones, provided that the platform
must include dedicated functionality for supporters, providing
tailored resources to help them assist those struggling with
gambling addiction
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245)...................... 850,000
Total
$34,349,270


SB 1757 20
Section 8.260. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees' Retirement System, and insurance premiums for
State Highway Patrol employees assigned to work under the
direction of the Gaming Commission
Personal Service...............................................$9,517,152
Expense and Equipment...................................... 631,152
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................10,148,304

For the enforcement of sports wagering provided under Article III
Section 39(g) of the Constitution of the state of Missouri
Personal Service
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)............................... 308,520
Total
$10,456,824

Section 8.265. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
that is credited to the Gaming Commission Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)................................... $100,000

Section 8.270. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
received for bingo fees
From Bingo Proceeds for Education Fund (1289).............................. $5,000

Section 8.275. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
that is credited to the Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285). .......................... $50,000

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Sports Wagering Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)............................... 6,805,078

SB 1757 21
Total
$6,855,078

Section 8.280. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For breeding incentive payments
From Missouri Breeders Fund (1605). ...................................... $5,000

Section 8.285. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286).................................$11,000,000

Section 8.290. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri National Guard Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................$4,000,000

Section 8.295. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Access Missouri Financial Assistance Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)..................................$5,000,000

Section 8.300. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gamblers Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)................................... $194,181

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286)............................... 11,500,000
Total
$11,694,181

Section 8.305. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For Administration and Emergency Operations, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service...............................................$2,126,646
Expense and Equipment...................................... 203,168
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,329,814

SB 1757 22

Personal Service................................................2,488,656
Expense and Equipment...................................... 909,819
From State Emergency Management Federal and Other Fund (1145). ...........3,398,475

Personal Service................................................1,141,909
Expense and Equipment...................................... 654,196
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal and Other
Fund (1143). ..................................................1,796,105

Personal Service................................................. 355,278
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,350
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663)....................................... 382,628

Personal Service................................................. 206,361
Expense and Equipment...................................... 130,344
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587).................... 336,705
Total
$8,243,727

Section 8.310. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Disaster Medical Assistance Team
Personal Service................................................ $263,107
Expense and Equipment...................................... 100,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $363,107

Section 8.315. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Missouri Task Force 1
For expenses of Missouri Task Force 1, a division of the Boone County
Fire Protection District, when it responds to emergencies and
disasters in the State of Missouri and conducts annual training
and exercises. These expenses may include, but are not limited
to personnel salaries and benefits, supplies, and repair or
replacement of damaged equipment, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101)...................................... $225,000

Section 8.320. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Community Right-to-Know Act

SB 1757 23
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587)........................ $750,000

For local emergency planning commissions to implement the federal
Hazardous Materials Transportation Uniform Safety Act of
1990
From State Emergency Management Federal and Other Fund (1145). ....... 595,000
Total
$1,345,000

Section 8.325. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency, provided five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within this
section
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for
administrative and training expenses of the State Emergency
Management Agency and for first responder training programs,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
From State Emergency Management Federal and Other Fund (1145). .........$29,262,386

For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for the use of
the State Emergency Management Agency for alleviating
distress from disasters
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663).................................. 1,101,213,964

For matching funds for federal grants and for emergency assistance
expenses of the State Emergency Management Agency as
provided in Section 44.032, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................40,048,548

For expenses of any state agency responding during a declared
emergency at the direction of the governor provided the services
furnish immediate aid and relief
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,190,729

For expenses of non-declared disasters to include response, recovery, or
mitigation activities, and preparation and planning to local
emergency planning commissions, districts, and management
agencies

SB 1757 24
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................1,000,000

Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Disaster Relief Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................186,000,000

For expenses of any City not within a county responding to a disaster
for which a presidential declaration has been requested by the
Governor, to provide relief associated with such disaster
From Disaster Relief Fund (1220).................................... 186,000,000
Total
$1,546,715,627

Section 8.330. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For resource sharing through mutual aid agreements at the direction of
the governor
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,000,000

Section 8.335. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1

Section 8.500. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Administration, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service...............................................$1,946,445
Expense and Equipment...................................... 183,059
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................2,129,504

Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in
compliance with the United States Department of Justice
Equitable Sharing Program guidelines
From National Guard Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1141).................. 240,944
Total
$2,370,448


SB 1757 25
Section 8.505. To the Department of the National Guard
For activities in support of the Missouri National Guard, including the
National Guard Tuition Assistance Program and the Military
Honors Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service................................................. $54,447
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,343,965
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,398,412

Personal Service................................................2,200,632
Expense and Equipment...................................... 3,201,247
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900). ...................... 5,401,879
Total
$8,800,291

Section 8.510. To the Department of the National Guard
For deployment of the National Guard to support security operations
for the 2026 World Cup
From General Revenue Fund (1101).....................................$1,671,720

Section 8.515. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Veterans Recognition Program
Personal Service................................................ $143,546
Expense and Equipment...................................... 200,000
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)............ $343,546

Section 8.520. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Field Support, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service...............................................$1,301,335
Expense and Equipment...................................... 1,901,217
From General Revenue Fund (1101)......................................3,202,552

Personal Service................................................. 150,504
Expense and Equipment...................................... 98,417
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)............................ 248,921
Total
$3,451,473

Section 8.525. To the Department of the National Guard
For operational expenses at armories from armory rental fees

SB 1757 26
Expense and Equipment
From Adjutant General Revolving Fund (1530). ............................. $55,000

Section 8.530. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Missouri Military Family Relief Program
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Military Family Relief Fund (1719). .......................... $10,000

For grants to family members of the National Guard and reservists who
are in financial need
From Missouri Military Family Relief Fund (1719). ..................... 140,000
Total
$150,000

Section 8.535. To the Department of the National Guard
For training site operating costs
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269)..................... $330,000

Section 8.540. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Contract Services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service................................................ $642,346
Expense and Equipment...................................... 27,773
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... 670,119

Personal Service...............................................21,094,367
Expense and Equipment...................................... 16,864,816
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)...............................37,959,183

Personal Service
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269)....................... 30,361

Expense and Equipment
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900). ........................... 673,938

For refund of federal overpayments to the state for the Contract
Services Program
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190)............................ 865,561
Total
$40,199,162

Section 8.545. To the Department of the National Guard

SB 1757 27
For the Office of Air Search and Rescue, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
From General Revenue Fund (1101)....................................... $65,743

Section 8.550. To the Department of the National Guard
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101)............................................$1
(cid:252)